dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বই__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="গড়__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নবী__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণ</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="মনোনয়ন"><i>মনোনয়ন</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ধার"><i>উদ্ধার</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্প্রচার"><i>সম্প্রচার</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কার্যক্রম"><i>কার্যক্রম</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নবী"><i>নবী</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="আহত"><i>আহত</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইঙ্গিত"><i>ইঙ্গিত</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊধ্ব"><i>ঊধ্ব</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অবসান"><i>অবসান</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লক্ষ"><i>লক্ষ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্মাণ"><i>নির্মাণ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রকাশ"><i>প্রকাশ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অর্পণ"><i>অর্পণ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রসাদ"><i>প্রসাদ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চলাচল"><i>চলাচল</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউ"><i>ইউ</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="অগ্রাধিকার"><i>অগ্রাধিকার</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভোট"><i>ভোট</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রদান"><i>প্রদান</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বরখাস্ত"><i>বরখাস্ত</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিকেল"><i>বিকেল</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অধিবেশন"><i>অধিবেশন</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্ছেদ"><i>উচ্ছেদ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রূপ"><i>রূপ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লাশ"><i>লাশ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিবির"><i>শিবির</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাজির"><i>হাজির</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দুই"><i>দুই</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সংক্রান্ত"><i>সংক্রান্ত</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পিতা"><i>পিতা</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="পাহাড়"><i>পাহাড়</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পেশ"><i>পেশ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গার্মেন্টস"><i>গার্মেন্টস</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সড়ক"><i>সড়ক</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বই"><i>বই</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুভব"><i>অনুভব</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সফর"><i>সফর</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংযোগ"><i>সংযোগ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মেশিন"><i>মেশিন</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংকেত"><i>সংকেত</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লঞ্চ"><i>লঞ্চ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গেট"><i>গেট</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="যাচাই"><i>যাচাই</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ট্রাক"><i>ট্রাক</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মিটার"><i>মিটার</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বর্ণ"><i>বর্ণ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শপিং"><i>শপিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রেসিং"><i>রেসিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="স্পোর্টিং"><i>স্পোর্টিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ট্রেনিং"><i>ট্রেনিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জবাই"><i>জবাই</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="লোডশেডিং"><i>লোডশেডিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বাণিজ্যমন্ত্রী"><i>বাণিজ্যমন্ত্রী</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বীরশ্রেষ্ঠ"><i>বীরশ্রেষ্ঠ</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মার্কেটিং"><i>মার্কেটিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বাঁ"><i>বাঁ</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="এভিনিউ"><i>এভিনিউ</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="হাউজিং"><i>হাউজিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="স্টাম্পিং"><i>স্টাম্পিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রোগ্রামিং"><i>প্রোগ্রামিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="দেবতা"><i>দেবতা</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ল"><i>ল</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="অপারেটিং"><i>অপারেটিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জন্ম"><i>জন্ম</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রং"><i>রং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রেকর্ডিং"><i>রেকর্ডিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রেটিং"><i>রেটিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="তড়িৎ"><i>তড়িৎ</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জগৎ"><i>জগৎ</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সেনাপতি"><i>সেনাপতি</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সাধু"><i>সাধু</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মতবাদ"><i>মতবাদ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বচন"><i>বচন</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কম্পিউটিং"><i>কম্পিউটিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বলয়"><i>বলয়</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="টাইম"><i>টাইম</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রিং"><i>রিং</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গৌরব"><i>গৌরব</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বর্ণযুগ"><i>স্বর্ণযুগ</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মহারাজা"><i>মহারাজা</i><par n="নবী__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাই"><i>ছাই</i><par n="বই__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="অবস্থান্তর"><i>অবস্থান্তর</i><par n="গড়__n_mf"/></e>
